Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142D.21, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Requirements. (a) As a condition of payment under this section, a program must: (1) complete an application developed by the commissioner for each payment period for which the program applies for fundingnew text begin . For full-time equivalent staff who regularly care for children in the program, the application must allow required paid break time, professional development or training hours up to 24 hours annually, and paid vacation time taken to count as qualifying hours toward a program's reporting of eligible full-time equivalent staffnew text end ; (2) submit data on child enrollment and attendance to the commissioner in the form and manner specified by the commissioner; and (3) attest and agree in writing that the program was open and operating and served a minimum number of children, as determined by the commissioner, during the funding period, with the exceptions of: (i) service disruptions that are necessary to protect the safety and health of children and child care programs based on public health guidance issued by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the commissioner of health, the commissioner of children, youth, and families, or a local public health agency; and (ii) planned temporary closures for provider vacation and holidays during each payment period. The commissioner must establish the maximum allowed duration for vacations and holidays. (b) A program must expend money received under this section no later than six months after the date the payment was received. (c) A program that receives a payment under this section must comply with all requirements listed in the application. The commissioner must establish methods to determine that the application requirements have been met.